apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="/ale__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ali</l>   <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alen</l>  <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alt</l>   <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ale</l>   <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ali</l>   <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alt</l>   <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alne</l>  <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alte</l>  <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alne</l>  <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alte</l>  <r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alande</l><r>ale<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>al</l>    <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ala</l>   <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ale</l>   <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alast</l> <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ale</l>   <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ali</l>   <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alt</l>   <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aler</l>  <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>el</l>    <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alte</l>  <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ol</l>    <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/jelde__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>oldi</l>  <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jeld</l>  <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olden</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldt</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jeld</l>  <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olde</l>  <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oldi</l>  <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldt</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelde</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oldne</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldte</l><r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelde</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oldne</l> <r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldte</l><r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldande</l><r>jelde<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelde</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeld</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jelde</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldast</l><r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeldt</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jeld</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olde</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oldi</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jeldar</l><r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelder</l><r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeld</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aldt</l>  <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jaldt</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelda</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jelde</l> <r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jeldte</l><r>jelde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/elle__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ollen</l> <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ellande</l><r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elle</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elle</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ellast</l><r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elt</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ellar</l> <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eller</l> <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ella</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elte</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gjelde">          <i>g</i><par n="g/jelde__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ale"><i></i><par n="/ale__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skrelle"><i>skr</i><par n="v/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velle"><i>v</i><par n="v/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
